Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB645.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "nonrepairable vehicle" and "reconstructed vehicle" in section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Nonrepairable vehicle." An abandoned vehicle under paragraph (1)(iii) of the definitions of "abandoned vehicle" which is incapable of safe operation for use on roadways or highways and which has no resale value except as a source of parts or scrap only, a salvage vehicle issued a nonrepairable or nonrebuildable vehicle document by another state or a vehicle which a salvor or vehicle salvage dealer designates as a source for parts or scrap or which the owner irreversibly designates as a source for parts or scrap. Such vehicles may not be issued a certificate of title or certificate of salvage[.], except as permitted under section 1166.1 (relating to salvor nonrepairable vehicle reconstruction).* * *"Reconstructed vehicle." A vehicle, other than an antique or classic vehicle, for which a certificate of salvage was issued and is thereafter restored to operating condition to meet the vehicle equipment and inspection standards under Part IV (relating to vehicle characteristics). The term shall not include a nonrepairable vehicle reconstructed under section 1166.1.* * *Section 2. Sections 1109, 1162(b)(1) and 1163(c) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 1109. Refusing issuance of certificate.The department may refuse issuance of a certificate of title or certificate of salvage when it has reasonable grounds to believe:(1) That any required fee has not been paid.20250HB0645PN0654 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) That any taxes payable under the laws of this Commonwealth on or in connection with, or resulting from, the acquisition or use of the vehicle have not been paid.(3) That the applicant is not the owner of the vehicle.(4) That the application contains a false or fraudulent statement.(5) That the applicant has failed to furnish required information or documents or any additional information the department reasonably requires.(6) That the vehicle is a nonrepairable vehicle[.], except as permitted under section 1166.1 (relating to salvor nonrepairable vehicle reconstruction).§ 1162. Transfer to vehicle salvage dealer.* * *(b) Certificate of title.--Upon transfer of a certificate of title to a salvage vehicle dealer, the salvage vehicle dealer shall immediately send to the department or an authorized agent of the department either of the following:(1) The assigned certificate of title attached to a form prescribed by the department indicating that the vehicle is to be designated as a nonrepairable vehicle. A copy of the form shall be retained for record in accordance with section 6308(d) (relating to investigation by police officers). The vehicle shall not be rebuilt, retitled or issued a certificate of any kind[.], except as permitted under section 1166.1 (relating to salvor nonrepairable vehicle reconstruction).* * *§ 1163. Transfer to scrap metal processor.* * *20250HB0645PN0654 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Certificate of title.--Upon transfer of a certificate of title to a scrap metal processor, the scrap metal processor shall immediately send to the department or an authorized agent of the department the assigned certificate of title attached to a form prescribed by the department indicating that the vehicle is to be designated as a nonrepairable vehicle. A copy of the form shall be retained for record in accordance with section 6308(d). The vehicle shall not be rebuilt, retitled or issued a certificate of any kind[.], except as permitted under section 1166.1 (relating to salvor nonrepairable vehicle reconstruction).* * *Section 3. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1166.1. Salvor nonrepairable vehicle reconstruction. (a) Reconstruction.--A salvor may restore to operating condition a nonrepairable vehicle subject to the provisions of this section.(b) Enhanced inspection.--Prior to the issuance of a certificate of title by the department under subsection (c), a nonrepairable vehicle must pass an enhanced vehicle safety inspection as specified in departmental contracts, policy guidelines or regulations as deemed appropriate by the department.(c) Application for a reconstructed nonrepairable vehicle certificate of title and registration.--A reconstructed nonrepairable vehicle title and registration may be issued to a salvor if the salvor presents to the department an application for a certificate of title for a reconstructed nonrepairable vehicle upon a form furnished and prescribed by the department and any other information the department deems appropriate, 20250HB0645PN0654 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including information that the reconstructed nonrepairable vehicle has successfully passed the enhanced inspection required under subsection (b).(d) Nonrepairable vehicles from other states.--(1) For an application submitted under subsection (c) for a nonrepairable vehicle that has a nonrepairable or nonrebuildable vehicle document issued by another state or a vehicle for which a salvor or vehicle salvage dealer from another state designates as a source for parts or scrap, the department may issue a certificate of title for the reconstructed nonrepairable vehicle branded as an out-of-State nonrepairable vehicle.(2) A salvor may not sell or otherwise transfer ownership of a reconstructed nonrepairable vehicle issued a certificate of title under paragraph (1) to a person who is not a resident of this Commonwealth or otherwise not permitted to register a vehicle within this Commonwealth unless:(i) the certificate of title under paragraph (1) is returned to the department; and(ii) the vehicle is sold or ownership is transferred according to the title, documentation or designation from another state previous to receiving the certificate of title under paragraph (1).(3) The department shall conspicuously print on a certificate of title issued under paragraph (1) a statement containing the prohibition under paragraph (2).(e) Penalties.-- (1) A person who violates the provisions of this section commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be 20250HB0645PN0654 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sentenced to pay a fine of $500 for each violation.(2) The department may suspend or revoke the salvor certificate of a salvor who violates subsection (d)(2).Section 4. Sections 4702.1, 4723.1 and 7304 of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 4702.1. Limited liability of inspection station or mechanic.(a) General rule.--An inspection conducted pursuant to section 4702(a) (relating to annual inspection), 1166.1 (relating to salvor nonrepairable vehicle reconstruction) or 1165.1 (relating to inspection of reconstructed, modified and specially constructed vehicles) shall not be construed as a guaranty of the safety of any vehicle and neither the official inspection station issuing the certificate of inspection nor the official inspection mechanic performing the inspection shall be liable to the owner or occupants of any inspected vehicle for any damages caused by the failure or malfunction of that vehicle or to the owner or occupants of any vehicle involved in an accident with that inspected vehicle or to any pedestrian injured in the accident unless it can be shown by a preponderance of the evidence that the failure was caused by the negligence of the inspection station or mechanic. An official inspection mechanic in the course of his duties relating to the road test portion of an official vehicle safety inspection shall not be cited by law enforcement personnel for any violation relating to vehicle equipment. This provision does not preclude an official inspection mechanic from being cited by law enforcement personnel for moving violations committed during the road test portion of an official vehicle safety inspection.§ 4723.1. Certificate of appointment for enhanced vehicle safety inspection for reconstructed vehicle, modified 20250HB0645PN0654 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or specially constructed inspection stations.The department shall issue a certificate of appointment for enhanced vehicle safety inspection for reconstructed vehicle, modified or specially constructed inspection stations[.] or for inspection stations performing enhanced safety inspections in accordance with section 1166.1 (relating to salvor nonrepairable vehicle reconstruction).§ 7304. Reports to department of possession of abandoned vehicles.Any salvor taking possession of an abandoned vehicle pursuant to section 7303.1 (relating to duty of police and salvors) shall within 48 hours after taking possession send an abandoned vehicle information report to the department. If the report indicates the vehicle is a salvage vehicle, the salvor shall include a photograph of the vehicle to be prepared in a manner prescribed by the department. Any nonrepairable vehicle which does not display an identifiable registration plate, current certificate of inspection and ascertainable vehicle identification number shall be taken into possession and flattened or crushed immediately[.] unless the salvor intends to reconstruct the nonrepairable vehicle in accordance with section 1166.1 (relating to salvor nonrepairable vehicle reconstruction). There is no requirement to notify the department[.] unless the salvor intends to reconstruct the nonrepairable vehicle in accordance with section 1166.1. The department shall require, upon a form furnished and prescribed by the department, a salvor to notify the department of the salvor's intent to reconstruct a nonrepairable vehicle in accordance with section 1166.1.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0645PN0654 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930